Wisconsin, session 2025, AB425.
do enact as follows:AB425,13Section 1. 341.25 (1) (gm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB425,2,54341.25 (1) (gm) 1. Each trailer or temporary undercarriage towed by a motor 1vehicle registered pursuant to sub. (2) and used solely for transporting a modular 2housing unit, manufactured housing unit, or other portable building used or 3intended to be used for human occupancy may be operated on the highways of this 4state without such trailer or temporary undercarriage being registered if it has 5displayed upon it a valid registration plate issued under this section.AB425,2,1662. Any person may apply to the department for registration as a transporter 7under this paragraph on such form as the department provides. If the department 8determines that the person is entitled to be registered, the department shall 9register the person upon payment of the same fee as prescribed in par. (g), based on 10the maximum combined gross weight of the building and trailer or temporary 11undercarriage upon which the plate is displayed. The registration and plate are 12valid only during the calendar year in which they were issued and shall be subject 13to s. 341.30 (1) (c). Such plate may be used on any trailer or temporary 14undercarriage owned by the same person and used solely for transporting a 15modular housing unit, manufactured housing unit, or other portable building as 16referred to above and the return of empty trailers or temporary undercarriages.AB425,2,1717